Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 1 General Provisions
25-1-503. Prohibition on contracting with entities that boycott Israel.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a public entity shall not:

Enter into a contract with a company to acquire or dispose of services, supplies, information technology, or construction unless the contract includes a written certification that the person or company is not currently engaged in, and agrees for the duration of the contract not to engage in, a boycott of Israel; or

Engage in boycotts of Israel.

This section does not apply to:

A company that fails to meet the requirements under subdivision (a)(1) of this section but offers to provide the goods or services for at least twenty percent (20%) less than the lowest certifying business; or

Contracts with a total potential value of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

If, following the engagement by the public entity through its asset managers with a restricted company, that company ceases activity that designates it as a restricted company and submits a written certification to the public entity that it shall not reengage in such activity for the duration of any investment by the public entity, the company shall be removed from the restricted companies list.

The public entity shall keep and maintain the list of restricted companies and all written certifications from restricted and previously restricted companies.

Each public entity shall identify the companies on the list of restricted companies of which the public entity owns direct holdings and indirect holdings;

The public entity shall instruct its investment advisors to sell, redeem, divest, or withdraw all direct holdings of restricted companies from the public entity's assets under management in an orderly and fiduciarily responsible manner within three (3) months after the appearance of the company on the list of restricted companies; and

Upon request from the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, each public entity shall provide the Arkansas Development Finance Authority with information regarding investments sold, redeemed, divested, or withdrawn in compliance under this section.

The public entity shall not acquire securities of restricted companies as part of direct holdings.

Subsection (b) of this section does not apply to the public entity's indirect holdings or private market funds.

The public entity shall submit letters to the managers of those investment funds identifying restricted companies and requesting that those investment funds consider removing the investments in the restricted companies from the funds.

The costs associated with the divestment activities of the public entity shall be borne by the respective public entity.

With respect to actions taken in compliance with this section, including all good-faith determinations regarding companies as required under this section, any statewide retirement system and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority are exempt from any conflicting statutory or common law obligations, including any fiduciary duties and any obligations with respect to choice of asset managers, investment funds, or investments for the statewide retirement systems' portfolios.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1202, §§ 1-3, provided: “SECTION 1. Legislative intent.

“(a)The General Assembly declares that this act is necessary to:

“(1)Enhance the delivery of services to the people of Arkansas in an effective and efficient manner;

“(2)Provide for administrative cost savings in the delivery of these services by combining overlapping functions and eliminating duplications of functions of state government; and

“(3)Achieve the grouping of state agencies into provisional principal departments primarily according to function in order to facilitate an increase in efficiency and reduction of administrative costs.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for a study of an orderly transfer of powers, authorities, duties, and functions of the various state agencies to the provisional principal departments with a minimum of disruption of governmental services and functions and with a minimum of expense.

“(c)As used in this act, ‘principal department’ means the:

“(1)Department of Agriculture;

“(2)Department of Commerce;

“(3)Department of Interior;

“(4)Department of Health and Human Services;

“(5)Department of Corrections [Department of Correction];

“(6)Department of Education;

“(7)Department of Finance and Administration;

“(8)Department of Labor, Employment, and Workforce;

“(9)Department of Natural Resources;

“(10)Department of Homeland Security; and

“(11)Additional departments as the Governor deems necessary in order to facilitate an increase in efficiency and reduction of administrative costs.”

“SECTION 2.“(a)(1)The Governor may appoint provisional department secretaries to assist with the study.

“(2)The provisional principal department secretaries or the office of the Governor may undertake and implement an efficiency study designed to achieve the maximum possible financial savings in current budgeted administrative costs.

“(3)Each entity designated to be studied for transfer under this act shall identify and report to the provisional principal department secretaries, the office of the Governor, the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs, and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs, the total administrative costs for the entity in real dollar amounts.

“(4)The provisional principal department secretaries or the office of the Governor may:

“(A)Utilize the results of the analysis from the efficiency study to develop a detailed plan to further reorganize their respective departments and eliminate duplication of effort and unnecessary duplication of equipment and facilities; and

“(B)If provisional principal department secretaries are appointed, complete their analyses of the reorganization of state government and prepare a final report for delivery to the Governor.

“(5)The provisional principal department secretaries' or office of the Governor's plan for reorganization may include without limitation:

“(A)Estimated costs of reorganization;

“(B)Projected savings from reorganization in real dollar amounts;

“(C)Projected improvements in service;

“(D)Anticipated effects on cost-sharing and management of federal grants;

“(E)Provisions for efficient citizen input to department decisions;

“(F)Planned mechanisms for appeals of department actions;

“(G)Methods of assuring accountability for results;

“(H)Proposed timetables for implementation;

“(I)Proposed legislation required to implement reorganization;

“(J)Required changes to the Arkansas Administrative Statewide Information System, estimated costs, and a timeline for the required changes to be accomplished;

“(K)Recommendations as to whether reorganization into the ten (10) provisional departments as proposed by this act is the most efficient structure for organization; and

“(L)Recommendations as to which powers and duties should be retained by the agencies transferred under the provisional departments.

“(6)The provisional principal department secretaries may provide progress reports outlining the status of the study to:

“(A)The Governor; and

“(B)The House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

“(b)The Governor, in conjunction with the provisional principal department secretaries, if any, may provide the plans for reorganization to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.”

“SECTION 3. The agencies to be studied for reorganization or transfer may include without limitation the following:

“(1)The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission under §2-33-101 et seq., §2-33-201 et seq., §2-33-301 et seq., and §2-33-401 et seq.;

“(2)The Department of Rural Services under §15-6-105;

“(3)The Arkansas Rural Development Commission under §15-6-104;

“(4)The State Plant Board under §2-16-206;

“(5)The Division of Agriculture Development of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority under §15-5-802;

“(6)The Arkansas Economic Development Commission under §§15-4-205 —15-4-210;

“(7)The Arkansas Economic Development Council under §15-4-201;

“(8)The Arkansas Waterways Commission under §15-23-201;

“(9)The State Insurance Department under §23-61-101;

“(10)The Arkansas Science and Technology Authority under §15-3-103;

“(11)The Board of Directors of the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority under §15-3-104;

“(12)The State Bank Department under §23-46-201 et seq.;

“(13)The State Banking Board under §23-46-301;

“(14)The State Securities Department under §23-42-201;

“(15)The Arkansas Public Service Commission under §23-2-101;

“(16)The Arkansas Department of Aeronautics under §27-115-101;

“(17)The Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality under §25-14-101;

“(18)The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under §8-4-104;

“(19)The Department of Correction under §12-27-101;

“(20)The Department of Community Correction under §12-27-125;

“(21)The Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator under §12-26-103;

“(22)The Parole Board under §16-93-201;

“(23)The Board of Correction [Board of Corrections] under §12-27-104;

“(24)The Department of Education under §25-6-102;

“(25)The State Board of Education under §6-11-101;

“(26)The Advisory Council for Education of Children with Disabilities under §6-41-211;

“(27)The Advisory Council for Education of Gifted and Talented Children under §6-42-104;

“(28)The Arkansas School for the Blind under §6-43-201;

“(29)The Arkansas School for the Deaf under §6-43-301;

“(30)The Board of Trustees for the Arkansas School for the Blind and the Arkansas School for the Deaf under §6-43-101;

“(31)The Board of Trustees for the Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts under §6-42-201;

“(32)The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education under §20-78-205;

“(33)The Department of Higher Education under §25-7-101;

“(34)The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board under §6-53-203;

“(35)The State Board of Career Education under §25-30-101;

“(36)Arkansas Rehabilitation Services under §25-30-106;

“(37)Arkansas Tech University Ozark Campus, Arkansas Northeastern College, Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute, Northwest Technical Institute, Riverside Vocational and Technical School, and National Park Community College;

“(39)The local boards of directors of Arkansas Tech University Ozark Campus, Arkansas Northeastern College, Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute, Northwest Technical Institute, Riverside Vocational and Technical School, and National Park Community College;

“(40)The Arkansas Educational Television Commission under §6-3-101;

“(41)The Department of Finance and Administration under §25-8-101;

“(42)The Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service Commission under §26-24-101(1)(A);

“(43)The State Insurance Department responsibilities of the insurance premium tax levied under §§26-57-603,26-57-604, and26-57-605 and the legal insurance premium tax levied under §23-91-226;

“(44)The Assessment Coordination Department under §25-28-101;

“(45)The Arkansas Building Authority under §22-2-104;

“(46)The Arkansas Building Authority Council under §22-2-106;

“(47)The State Technology Council under §25-33-101;

“(48)The Department of Information Systems under §25-4-104;

“(49)The Arkansas Racing Commission under §23-110-201;

“(50)The Federal Surplus Property Program under §19-11-601;

“(51)The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of the Department of Finance and Administration under §3-2-201;

“(52)The On-Site Sewage Disposal Program under §14-236-101 and the Marine Sanitation Program under §19-6-490;

“(53)The State Board of Health under §20-7-102;

“(54)The Arkansas Minority Health Commission under §20-2-102;

“(55)The Department of Human Services under §25-10-101;

“(56)The State Department for Social Security Administration Disability Determination under §20-76-301;

“(57)The Department of Veterans Affairs under §20-81-102;

“(58)The Arkansas Veterans' Commission under §20-81-104;

“(59)The Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare Service Office under §20-81-101;

“(60)The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services under §25-10-104;

“(61)The Child Welfare Agency Review Board under §9-28-403;

“(62)The Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board under §25-10-402;

“(63)The Arkansas Drug Director of the Office of the Governor under §20-64-1001;

“(64)The Arkansas Tobacco Control Board under §26-57-255;

“(65)The Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division under §3-2-203;

“(66)The Department of Arkansas State Police under §12-8-101;

“(67)The Arkansas State Police Commission under §12-8-102;

“(68)The Arkansas State Crime Information Center under §12-12-201;

“(69)The Supervisory Board of the Arkansas Crime Information Center under §12-12-202;

“(70)The State Crime Laboratory under §12-12-301;

“(71)The State Crime Laboratory Board under §12-12-302;

“(72)The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training under §12-9-103;

“(73)The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management under §12-75-109;

“(74)The State Military Department under Acts 1929, No. 85;

“(75)The Victim of Crime Justice Assistance Grants Division, the Law Enforcement Block Grants Division, the Violent Offender Incarceration Grants Division, and the Drug Law Enforcement Grants Division of the Department of Finance and Administration;

“(76)The Department of Parks and Tourism under §25-13-101;

“(77)The Department of Arkansas Heritage under §25-3-102;

“(78)The State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission under §15-11-201;

“(79)The Plantation Agriculture Museum Advisory Commission;

“(80)The Prairie Grove Battlefield Commission under §13-7-401;

“(81)The Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources Advisory Committee under §13-5-404;

“(82)The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission under §13-7-302;

“(83)The Delta Cultural Center Policy Advisory Board under §13-5-704;

“(84)The Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission under §15-20-304;

“(85)The Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise under §13-5-902;

“(86)The Old State House Commission under §13-7-201;

“(87)The Mississippi River Parkway Commission under §27-69-201;

“(88)The Arkansas Entertainers Hall of Fame Board under §13-9-101;

“(89)The Arkansas History Commission under §13-3-101;

“(90)The Arkansas State Library under §13-2-203;

“(91)The State Library Board under §13-2-205;

“(92)The State Historic Preservation Officer under §13-7-107;

“(93)The State Review Committee for Historic Preservation under §13-7-108;

“(94)The Advisory Council of the Arkansas Arts Council under §13-8-103;

“(95)The Keep Arkansas Beautiful Commission under §15-11-601;

“(96)The Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Council under §15-12-201;

“(97)The Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission under §25-24-101;

“(98)The Arkansas Museum Review Panel under §13-5-207;

“(99)The Arkansas Scenic Resources Preservation Coordinating Committee under §15-20-707;

“(100)The Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee under §25-3-104;

“(101)The Arkansas Workforce Investment Board under §15-4-2204;

“(102)The Arkansas Workforce Investment Board Executive Committee under §15-4-2205;

“(103)The Department of Workforce Services under §11-10-301;

“(104)The Board of Review under §11-10-523;

“(105)The State Employment Security Advisory Council under §11-10-305;

“(106)The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Oversight Board under §20-76-105(g);

“(107)The Department of Labor under §11-2-106;

“(108)The Boiler Advisory Board under §20-23-201;

“(109)The Board of Electrical Examiners under §17-28-201;

“(110)The Elevator Safety Board under §20-24-105;

“(111)The Workers' Compensation Commission under §11-9-201;

“(112)The Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Career Education under §6-52-101;

“(113)The Governor's Commission on People with Disabilities under §20-14-202;

“(114)The Arkansas Spinal Cord Commission under §20-8-202;

“(115)The Division of State Services for the Blind of the Department of Human Services under §25-10-102;

“(116)The Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind under §25-10-205;

“(117)The Oil and Gas Commission under §15-71-101;

“(118)The Director of Production and Conservation and the staff of the Oil and Gas Commission under §15-71-105;

“(119)The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission under §15-20-201;

“(120)The Commission on Water Well Commission under §17-50-201;

“(121)The Arkansas Forestry Commission under §15-31-101;

“(122)The Arkansas Geological Survey under §15-55-201;

“(123)The Division of Engineering, the HVACR Program of the Department of Health, and the Marine Sanitation Program, under §25-9-101;

“(124)The Federal Housing and Urban Development Community Development Block Grant program of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission;

“(125)The Department of Human Services, under §25-10-101 et seq.;

“(126)The Department of Health, under §25-9-101 et seq.; and

“(127)The Department of Information Systems, under §25-4-101 et seq.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1971, No. 38, which is primarily codified in chapters 2-14 of this title, reorganized the structure of state government by creating or continuing certain principal administrative departments into which various agencies and programs were transferred. However, many principal departments, referred to by Acts 1971, No. 38, are originally created, or their duties defined, by statutes which are integrally related to, and codified in, other titles of the Arkansas Code. It should also be noted that Acts 1971, No. 38, as amended, is not completely comprehensive and does not refer to a number of departments which are created elsewhere in the Arkansas Code. Please consult the notes throughout chapters 2-14 for references to relevant provisions in other titles.

Acts 1971, No. 38, also created several principal departments which were later abolished. Section 4 of the act, as amended by Acts 1975, No. 278, § 1, created the Department of Local Services which was abolished by Acts 1983, No. 690. Sections 14 and 16 of the act, respectively, created the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Commerce which were abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, and Acts 1983, No. 691, respectively.

Cross References. Damages adjudged against state officers and employees, payment by state, §21-9-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 23, 24: reorganizations under act to be completed on or before July 1, 1971. Act effective Feb. 4, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need to establish a more responsive and responsible state government sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions and to establish executive authority in those areas where executive responsibility presently lies and to promote economies in the operation of the government by the consolidation of various departments, boards, and commissions; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may procedures be established for effectuating a more responsive, responsible, and economic state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 16: July 1, 1985.

To create a structure of state government which will be responsive to the needs of the people of this state and sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions;

To establish executive authority over those areas where executive responsibility presently lies;

To provide a reasonable opportunity to create budgetary and administrative efficiencies within an orderly organizational structure of state government;

To strengthen the role of the General Assembly in state government;

To encourage greater participation of the public in state government;

To effect the grouping of state agencies into a limited number of departments primarily according to function; and

To eliminate overlapping and duplication of effort.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 1, provided, in part, that employees who were members of any retirement system at the time of the 1971 governmental reorganization would not lose any accrued retirement benefits as a result of the transfer of any department, commission, or agency. The employees were allowed six (6) months from the date of the transfer to elect whether to continue in the same retirement system or join the system for which the transfer made them eligible.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1971, No. 38, codified as §§6-11-101,6-11-102,25-2-101 —25-2-109, ,25-6-102,25-7-101,25-8-101,25-8-105, , ,25-10-102,25-10-106,25-11-101,25-11-102, ,25-13-101, .

History.

Acts 2017, No. 710, §
1.

25-1-504. Prohibition on direct investments in companies that boycott Israel.

(1)A public entity through its asset managers shall identify all companies that boycott Israel and assemble those identified companies into a list of restricted companies to be distributed to each retirement system.

For each company newly identified and added to the list of restricted companies, the public entity through its asset managers shall send a written notice informing the company of its status and that it may become subject to divestment by the public entity.

(1)The public entity shall adhere to the following procedures for companies on the list of restricted companies:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 710, §
1.

25-1-103. Records related to third-party liability for services provided by state.